Maryland, session 2025, HB0317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0317*

HOUSE BILL 317
1–101.
(P–1) “CURBSIDE VOTING” MEANS THE PROCESS BY WHICH A VOTER
COMPLETES AND CASTS A BALLOT AT AN OUTSIDE LOCATION DESIGNATED UNDER §
10–316 OF THIS ARTICLE AND UNDER OBSERVATION OF ELECTION JUDGES.
9–102.
(d) The State Board may not certify a voting system unless the State Board
determines that:
(1) the voting system will:
(i) protect the secrecy of the ballot;
(ii) protect the security of the voting process;
(iii) count and record all votes accurately;
(iv) accommodate any ballot used under this article;
(v) protect all other rights of voters and candidates;
(vi) be capable of creating a paper record of all votes cast in order
that an audit trail is available in the event of a recount, including a manual recount; [and]
(vii) provide a voter–verifiable paper record that:
1. is an individual document that is physically separated
from any other similar document and not part of a continuous roll;
2. is sufficiently durable to withstand repeated handling for
the purposes of mandatory random audits and recounts; and
3. uses ink that does not fade, smear, or otherwise degrade
and obscure or obliterate the paper record over time; AND
(VIII) FOR A VOTING SYSTEM USED IN THE CURBSIDE VOTING
PILOT PROGRAM UNDER § 10–316 OF THIS ARTICLE, ACCOMMODATE CURBSIDE
VOTING;
10–316.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE CURBSIDE VOTING
PILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 317 3
(B) THERE IS A CURBSIDE VOTING PILOT PROGRAM TO TEST THE
VIABILITY OF CURBSIDE VOTING IN THE STATE.
(C) THE STATE BOARD, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE LOCAL BOARDS, SHALL
IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(D) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE THE FOLLOWING
COUNTIES IN WHICH TO IMPLEMENT THE PILOT PROGRAM:
(I) ONE COUNTY WITH A COMPARATIVELY SMALL NUMBER OF
REGISTERED VOTERS;
(II) ONE COUNTY WITH A COMPARATIVELY MEDIUM NUMBER OF
REGISTERED VOTERS; AND
(III) ONE COUNTY WITH A COMPARATIVELY LARGE NUMBER OF
REGISTERED VOTERS.
(2) AT LEAST 6 MONTHS BEFORE EACH STATEWIDE PRIMARY
ELECTION, THE LOCAL BOARD OF EACH COUNTY DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL DESIGNATE A LOCATION FOR CURBSIDE VOTING
OUTSIDE:
(I) DURING EARLY VOTING, ONE EARLY VOTING CENTER OR
OTHER APPROPRIATE BUILDING AS DETERMINED BY THE LOCAL BOARD; AND
(II) ON ELECTION DAY:
1. THE OFFICE OF THE LOCAL BOARD;
2. IF USING THE OFFICE OF THE LOCAL BOARD IS NOT
PRACTICABLE, ONE POLLING PLACE; OR
3. IF USING THE OFFICE OF THE LOCAL BOARD OR A
POLLING PLACE IS NOT PRACTICABLE, AN APPROPRIATE BUILDING AS DETERMINED
BY THE LOCAL BOARD.
(3) A LOCAL BOARD SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT THE FOLLOWING
FACTORS WHEN DETERMINING A LOCATION FOR CURBSIDE VOTING:
(I) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE LOCATION TO HISTORICALLY
DISENFRANCHISED COMMUNITIES;

HOUSE BILL 317
(II) PROXIMITY OF THE LOCATION TO DENSE CONCENTRATIONS
OF VOTERS;
(III) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE LOCATION BY PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION; AND
(IV) MAXIMIZING VOTER PARTICIPATION, INCLUDING THROUGH
THE USE OF COMMUNITY CENTERS AND PUBLIC GATHERING PLACES AS LOCATIONS
FOR CURBSIDE VOTING.
(4) CURBSIDE VOTING SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE AT EACH
LOCATION ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ANY
REGISTERED VOTER ON REQUEST ON THE DAYS AND DURING THE HOURS THAT
EARLY VOTING CENTERS AND POLLING PLACES ARE OPEN.
(5) THE STATE BOARD AND EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL EMPHASIZE
IN COMMUNICATIONS WITH VOTERS AND THE GENERAL PUBLIC, INCLUDING
SIGNAGE AT EACH CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION, THAT CURBSIDE VOTING IS
PRIMARILY AN ACCOMMODATION FOR VOTERS WITH DISABILITIES, AS DEFINED IN
THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT, VOTERS WITH LIMITED
MOBILITY, AND ELDERLY VOTERS.
(5) (6) THE CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION SHALL BE EQUIPPED TO:
(I) ALLOW THE VOTER TO COMPLETE THE BALLOT WITHOUT
ASSISTANCE, UNLESS ASSISTANCE IS REQUESTED BY THE VOTER; AND
(II) PRESERVE THE SECRECY OF THE VOTER’S BALLOT WHILE
VOTING.
(6) (7) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE
BOARD, THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH:
1. A LINE AROUND EACH CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION
BEYOND WHICH CANVASSING, ELECTIONEERING, OR POSTING OF CAMPAIGN
MATERIAL IS PROHIBITED; AND
2. A BOUNDARY AROUND A CAR THAT IS WAITING IN LINE
FOR CURBSIDE VOTING WITHIN WHICH CANVASSING AND ELECTIONEERING IS
PROHIBITED.

HOUSE BILL 317 5
(II) IF A CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION IS ESTABLISHED
OUTSIDE AN EARLY VOTING CENTER OR POLLING PLACE, THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL,
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
1. ESTABLISH THE CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION WITHIN
THE LINE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 16–206(B) OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
2. AVOID EXPANDING THE AREA WITHIN THE LINE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 16–206(B) OF THIS ARTICLE TO ACCOMMODATE THE
CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION.
(E) AT EACH CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION, THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL:
(1) POST SIGNS INFORMING VOTERS OF:
(I) THE LOCATION OF CURBSIDE VOTING; AND
(II) HOW TO NOTIFY AN ELECTION JUDGE THAT THE VOTER IS
WAITING AT THE CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT VOTERS RECEIVE PROMPT SERVICE FROM THE
ELECTION JUDGES.
(F) (1) A VOTER SEEKING TO USE CURBSIDE VOTING SHALL:
(I) REQUEST CURBSIDE VOTING FROM AN ELECTION JUDGE AT
THE CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION; AND
(II) PROVIDE AN ELECTION JUDGE WITH THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED TO CHECK IN THE VOTER THROUGH THE POLLBOOK AT THE CURBSIDE
VOTING LOCATION.
(2) AN ELECTION JUDGE SHALL GIVE A VOTER USING CURBSIDE
VOTING THE CHOICE TO VOTE BY MARKING A PAPER BALLOT OR BY USING A BALLOT
MARKING DEVICE AT THE CURBSIDE VOTING LOCATION.
(3) IF THE VOTER CHOOSES TO VOTE USING A PAPER BALLOT, AFTER
MARKING THE BALLOT, THE VOTER SHALL DEPOSIT THE BALLOT IN THE CONTAINER
PROVIDED BY THE ELECTION JUDGE TO BE COUNTED.
(4) IF THE VOTER CHOOSES TO VOTE USING A BALLOT MARKING
DEVICE, AN ELECTION JUDGE SHALL BRING A BALLOT MARKING DEVICE OUTSIDE
TO THE VOTER.

HOUSE BILL 317
(G) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2029, THE STATE BOARD SHALL REPORT
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE CURBSIDE VOTING
PILOT PROGRAM.
(H) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of September
30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.